Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.225

Applications from school employees' children, nonresident students, or students receiving home-based instruction to attend district school—Acceptance and rejection standards—Notification.

(1) Except for students who reside out-of-state and students under RCW 28A.225.217, a district shall accept applications from nonresident students who are the children of full-time certificated and classified school employees, and those children shall be permitted to enroll:

(a) At the school to which the employee is assigned;

(b) At a school forming the district's K through 12 continuum which includes the school to which the employee is assigned; or

(c) At a school in the district that provides early intervention services pursuant to RCW 43.216.580 or preschool services pursuant to RCW 28A.155.070, if the student is eligible for such services.

(2) A district may reject applications under this section if:

(a) The student's disciplinary records indicate a history of convictions for offenses or crimes, violent or disruptive behavior, or gang membership;

(b) The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school for more than ten consecutive days. Any policy allowing for readmission of expelled or suspended students under this subsection (2)(b) must apply uniformly to both resident and nonresident applicants;

(c) Enrollment of a child under this section would displace a child who is a resident of the district, except that if a child is admitted under subsection (1) of this section, that child shall be permitted to remain enrolled at that school, or in that district's kindergarten through twelfth grade continuum, until he or she has completed his or her schooling; or

(d) The student has repeatedly failed to comply with requirements for participation in an online school program, such as participating in weekly direct contact with the teacher or monthly progress evaluations.

(3) A nonhigh district that is participating in an innovation academy cooperative may not accept an application from a high school student that conflicts with RCW 28A.340.080.

(4) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, all districts accepting applications from nonresident students or from students receiving home-based instruction for admission to the district's schools shall consider equally all applications received. Each school district shall adopt a policy establishing rational, fair, and equitable standards for acceptance and rejection of applications by June 30, 1990. The policy may include rejection of a nonresident student if:

(a) Acceptance of a nonresident student would result in the district experiencing a financial hardship;

(b) The student's disciplinary records indicate a history of convictions for offenses or crimes, violent or disruptive behavior, or gang membership;

(c) Accepting of the nonresident student would conflict with RCW 28A.340.080; or

(d) The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school for more than ten consecutive days. Any policy allowing for readmission of expelled or suspended students under this subsection (4)(d) must apply uniformly to both resident and nonresident applicants.

For purposes of subsections (2)(a) and (4)(b) of this section, "gang" means a group which: (i) Consists of three or more persons; (ii) has identifiable leadership; and (iii) on an ongoing basis, regularly conspires and acts in concert mainly for criminal purposes.

(5) The district shall provide to applicants written notification of the approval or denial of the application in a timely manner. If the application is rejected, the notification shall include the reason or reasons for denial and the right to appeal under RCW 28A.225.230(3).

[ 2020 c 90 s 6; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 511; 2013 c 192 s 2; 2009 c 380 s 7; 2008 c 192 s 1; 2003 c 36 s 1; 1999 c 198 s 2; 1997 c 265 s 3; 1995 c 52 s 3; 1994 c 293 s 1; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 203.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 90: See note following RCW 43.216.580.

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.

Severability—1997 c 265: See note following RCW 13.40.160.

Captions, headings not law—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: "Part headings and section headings do not constitute any part of the law." [ 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 501.]

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.